Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1404
Director of Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center; duties.

The director
of the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center shall devote full time to
the duties of the office and shall not engage in any other business or profession
or hold any other state public office. The director shall be responsible to
the executive director of the commission for the operation of the training
center and the conducting of training programs. The director of the training
center shall:

(1) Appoint and remove for cause such employees as may be
necessary for the operation of the training center and delegate appropriate
powers and duties to them;

(2) Conduct research for the purpose of evaluating and improving
the effectiveness of law enforcement training programs;

(3) Consult with the council on all matters pertaining to
training schools, training academies, and continuing education;

(4) Supervise the administration of the pre-certification
competency test;

(5) Ensure that all council rules and regulations with respect
to law enforcement pre-certification, certification, continuing education,
and training requirements are implemented and complied
with and, in that capacity, act as the director of standards for
the council;

(6) Advise the council concerning the operation of the training
center, the requirements, as set by the council, for all training schools
and training academies, and the formulation of training policies and regulations;

(7) Issue diplomas to students who successfully complete the
prescribed basic course of study;
and

(8) Maintain
continuing education records in a central registry.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 4, p. 2927;

Laws 1971, LB 929, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 17;

Laws 2012, LB817, § 7.
January 1, 2014